Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1079.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; JOBS FOUNDATION.new text end new text begin $450,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Jobs Foundation to support the Repowered workforce readiness program. Money may be used for direct training, support services, safety enhancements, and economic support for formerly incarcerated individuals experiencing barriers to employment. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end